Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2724
Uniformity of application and construction.

The Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act among states enacting it.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 24.